Massachusetts, session 194th, S1211.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 57 of chapter 276 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 12, the word “and”.
SECTION 2. Said section 57 of chapter 276 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
hereby further amended by inserting after the word “him”, in line 14, the following words:-
“; and may, if determined to be necessary, order the defendant to abide by specified
restrictions on personal associations or conduct including, but not limited to, avoiding all contact
with an alleged victim of the crime and any potential witness or witnesses who may testify
concerning the offense, as a condition of release.”
SECTION 3. Section 58B of chapter 276 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
further amended by inserting after the figure “42A”, in line 2, the following figure: - “, 57”.
of 1